Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1402
Formation; purposes.

Any number of persons, not less than five, engaged in the production of agricultural products or two or more nonprofit cooperative companies, stock or nonstock, may form a cooperative association without capital stock for the transaction of any lawful business by the adoption of articles of incorporation, as set forth in Chapter 21, article 14.

Laws 1925, c. 80, § 2, p. 248;

C.S.1929, § 24-1402;

R.S.1943, § 21-1402;

Laws 1951, c. 40, § 1, p. 146;

Laws 1981, LB 283, § 2.